District of Columbia statutes.
5-1418

Office of the Chief Medical Examiner Management Fund.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 2918a
as added Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 3002, 52 DCR 7503
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9051, 58 DCR 6226

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3002 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 202 of Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-429, July 30, 2012, 59 DCR 9387).
For temporary addition of D.C. Law 13-172, § 2918b, concerning blood and urine testing for the District’s impaired driving program, see § 202 of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 13325).

Short Title

Short title of subtitle A of title III of Law 16-33: Section 3001 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle A of title III of the act may be cited as the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner Management Fund Amendment Act of 2005.